New York, session 2025-2026, S7239.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative intent. The legislature hereby finds and 2 declares that the enactment of these appropriations provides sufficient 3 authority to the comptroller for the purpose of making payments for the 4 purposes described herein until such time as appropriation bills submit- 5 ted by the governor pursuant to article VII of the state constitution 6 for the support of government for the state fiscal year beginning April 7 1, 2025 are enacted. 8 § 2. Section 2 of chapter 113 of the laws of 2025, relating to making 9 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 117 10 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 11 § 2. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 12 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 13 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 14 public officers and for the purpose specified, which amount shall be 15 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2025. 16 ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 17 For the purpose of making payments for 18 personal service, including liabilities 19 incurred prior to April 1, 2025, on the 20 payrolls scheduled to be paid during the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD12004-01-5 S. 7239 2 1 period April 1 through April [7] 9, 2025 2 to state officers and employees of the 3 executive branch, including the governor, 4 lieutenant governor, comptroller, and 5 attorney general, and to employees of the 6 legislature. This appropriation also 7 includes payments for services performed 8 by mentally ill or developmentally disa- 9 bled persons who are employed in state-op- 10 erated special employment, work-for-pay or 11 sheltered workshop programs .............. 12 ............................. [324,930,000] 668,330,000 13 -------------- 14 § 3. Section 3 of chapter 113 of the laws of 2025, relating to making 15 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 117 16 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 17 § 3. The amount specified in this section, or so much thereof as shall 18 be sufficient to accomplish the purpose designated, is hereby appropri- 19 ated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the public 20 officers and for the purpose specified, which amount shall be available 21 for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2025. 22 ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 23 For the payment of state operations non 24 personal service liabilities to the execu- 25 tive branch, including the comptroller, 26 and the attorney general, incurred in the 27 ordinary course of business, during the 28 period April 1 through April [7] 9, 2025, 29 pursuant to existing state law and for 30 purposes for which the legislature author- 31 ized the expenditure of moneys during the 32 2024-2025 state fiscal year; provided, 33 however, that nothing contained herein 34 shall be deemed to limit or restrict the 35 power or authority of state departments or 36 agencies to conduct their activities or 37 operations in accordance with existing 38 law, and further provided that nothing 39 contained herein shall be deemed to super- 40 sede, nullify or modify the provisions of 41 section 40 of the state finance law 42 prescribing when appropriations made for 43 the 2024-2025 state fiscal year shall have 44 ceased to have force and effect .......... 45 .............................. [10,000,000] 20,000,000 46 -------------- 47 § 4. Section 4 of chapter 113 of the laws of 2025, relating to making 48 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 117 49 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 50 § 4. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 51 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 52 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the S. 7239 3 1 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 2 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2025. 3 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 4 GENERAL STATE CHARGES 5 STATE OPERATIONS 6 GENERAL STATE CHARGES ....................... [20,925,000] 50,175,000 7 -------------- 8 General Fund 9 State Purposes Account - 10050 10 For employee fringe benefits according to 11 the following project schedule including 12 those benefits which are related to 13 employees paid from funds, accounts, or 14 programs where the division of the budget 15 has issued waivers ........... [20,925,000] 50,175,000 16 Project Schedule 17 PROJECT AMOUNT 18 -------------------------------------------- 19 For the state's contribution 20 to the social security 21 contribution fund .......... 22 ................ [20,300,000] 49,550,000 23 For the state's share of 24 contributions to the volun- 25 tary defined contribution 26 plan made on behalf of 27 eligible employees pursuant 28 to chapter 18 of the laws of 29 2012 who elect to partic- 30 ipate in such plan and who 31 are not otherwise eligible 32 to participate in the SUNY 33 optional retirement program ...... 275,000 34 For the payment of the metro- 35 politan commuter transporta- 36 tion mobility tax pursuant 37 to article 23 of the tax 38 law, as added by chapter 25 39 of the laws of 2009, on 40 behalf of the state employ- 41 ees employed in the metro- 42 politan commuter transporta- 43 tion district .................... 350,000 44 -------------- 45 Project schedule total ... 46 ........... [20,925,000] 50,175,000 47 -------------- 48 § 5. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 49 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby S. 7239 4 1 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 2 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 3 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2025. 4 JUDICIARY 5 For the purpose of making payments for 6 personal service, including liabilities 7 incurred prior to April 1, 2025, on the 8 payrolls scheduled to be paid during the 9 period April 1 through April 9, 2025 to 10 officers and employees of the judiciary ..... 85,000,000 11 For the payment of employee fringe benefit 12 programs including, but not limited to, 13 the judiciary's contributions to the 14 health insurance fund, the employees' 15 retirement system pension accumulation 16 fund, the social security contribution 17 fund, employee benefit fund programs, the 18 dental insurance plan, the vision care 19 plan, the unemployment insurance fund, and 20 for workers' compensation benefits, the 21 sum of three hundred million dollars 22 ($300,000,000), or so much thereof as 23 shall be sufficient to accomplish the 24 purpose designated, is hereby appropriated 25 to the judiciary out of any moneys in the 26 general fund or other funds to the credit 27 of the state purposes account not other- 28 wise appropriated. The comptroller is 29 hereby authorized and directed to utilize 30 this appropriation for the purpose of 31 making payments for employee fringe bene- 32 fit liabilities incurred by the judiciary 33 from April 1 through April 9, 2025 ......... 300,000,000 34 -------------- 35 § 6. Section 5 of chapter 113 of the laws of 2025, relating to making 36 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 117 37 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 38 § 5. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 39 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 40 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 41 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 42 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2025. 43 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 44 AID TO LOCALITIES 45 CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH PROGRAM .......... [14,490,000] 16,630,000 46 -------------- 47 General Fund 48 Local Assistance Account - 10000 S. 7239 5 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 Indian health program. The money hereby 3 appropriated shall be for payment of 4 financial assistance heretofore accrued or 5 hereafter to accrue (26840) .................. 7,000,000 6 -------------- 7 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 8 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 9 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25022 10 For various federal food and nutritional 11 services. The moneys hereby appropriated 12 shall be available for payment of finan- 13 cial assistance heretofore accrued (26986) 14 ............................... [7,490,000] 9,630,000 15 -------------- 16 ELDERLY PHARMACEUTICAL INSURANCE COVERAGE PROGRAM ............ 1,520,000 17 -------------- 18 Special Revenue Funds - Other 19 HCRA Resources Fund 20 EPIC Premium Account - 20818 21 For services and expenses of the program for 22 elderly pharmaceutical insurance coverage, 23 including reimbursement to pharmacies 24 participating in such program. 25 The moneys hereby appropriated shall be 26 available for payment of financial assist- 27 ance heretofore accrued (26803) .............. 1,520,000 28 MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ............... [1,363,969,000] 2,222,408,000 29 -------------- 30 General Fund 31 Local Assistance Account - 10000 32 For the medical assistance program, includ- 33 ing administrative expenses, for local 34 social services districts, and for medical 35 care rates for authorized child care agen- 36 cies. 37 Notwithstanding section 40 of the state 38 finance law or any provision of law to the 39 contrary, subject to federal approval, 40 department of health state funds medicaid 41 spending, excluding payments for medical 42 services provided at state facilities 43 operated by the office of mental health, 44 the office for people with developmental 45 disabilities and the office of addiction 46 services and supports and further exclud- 47 ing any payments which are not appropri- 48 ated within the department of health, in S. 7239 6 1 the aggregate, for the period April 1, 2 2025 through March 31, 2026, shall not 3 exceed $33,417,285,000 except as provided 4 below provided, however, such aggregate 5 limits may be adjusted by the director of 6 the budget to account for any changes in 7 the New York state federal medical assist- 8 ance percentage amount established pursu- 9 ant to the federal social security act, 10 increases in provider revenues, reductions 11 in local social services district payments 12 for medical assistance administration, 13 minimum wage increases, and beginning 14 April 1, 2012 the operational costs of the 15 New York state medical indemnity fund, 16 pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of 17 2011, and state costs or savings from the 18 essential plan program. Such projections 19 may be adjusted by the director of the 20 budget to account for increased or expe- 21 dited department of health state funds 22 medicaid expenditures as a result of a 23 natural or other type of disaster, includ- 24 ing a governmental declaration of emergen- 25 cy. 26 The director of the budget, in consultation 27 with the commissioner of health, shall 28 assess on a quarterly basis known and 29 projected medicaid expenditures by catego- 30 ry of service and by geographic region, as 31 defined by the commissioner, incurred both 32 prior to and subsequent to such assessment 33 for each such period, and if the director 34 of the budget determines that such expend- 35 itures are expected to cause medicaid 36 spending for such period to exceed the 37 aggregate limit specified herein for such 38 period, the state medicaid director, in 39 consultation with the director of the 40 budget and the commissioner of health, 41 shall develop a medicaid savings allo- 42 cation adjustment to limit such spending 43 to the aggregate limit specified herein 44 for such period. 45 Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment 46 shall be designed, to reduce the expendi- 47 tures authorized by the appropriations 48 herein in compliance with the following 49 guidelines: (1) reductions shall be made 50 in compliance with applicable federal law, 51 including the provisions of the Patient 52 Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public 53 Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and 54 Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, 55 Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively 56 "Affordable Care Act") and any subsequent S. 7239 7 1 amendments thereto or regulations promul- 2 gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be 3 made in a manner that complies with the 4 state medicaid plan approved by the feder- 5 al centers for medicare and medicaid 6 services, provided, however, that the 7 commissioner of health is authorized to 8 submit any state plan amendment or seek 9 other federal approval, including waiver 10 authority, to implement the provisions of 11 the medicaid savings allocation adjustment 12 that meets the other criteria set forth 13 herein; (3) reductions shall be made in a 14 manner that maximizes federal financial 15 participation, to the extent practicable, 16 including any federal financial partic- 17 ipation that is available or is reasonably 18 expected to become available, in the 19 discretion of the commissioner, under the 20 Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall 21 be made uniformly among categories of 22 services and geographic regions of the 23 state, to the extent practicable, and 24 shall be made uniformly within a category 25 of service, to the extent practicable, 26 except where the commissioner determines 27 that there are sufficient grounds for 28 non-uniformity, including but not limited 29 to: the extent to which specific catego- 30 ries of services contributed to department 31 of health medicaid state funds spending in 32 excess of the limits specified herein; the 33 need to maintain safety net services in 34 underserved communities; or the potential 35 benefits of pursuing innovative payment 36 models contemplated by the Affordable Care 37 Act, in which case such grounds shall be 38 set forth in the medicaid savings allo- 39 cation adjustment; and (5) reductions 40 shall be made in a manner that does not 41 unnecessarily create administrative 42 burdens to medicaid applicants and recipi- 43 ents or providers. 44 The commissioner shall seek the input of the 45 legislature, as well as organizations 46 representing health care providers, 47 consumers, businesses, workers, health 48 insurers, and others with relevant exper- 49 tise, in developing such medicaid savings 50 allocation adjustment, to the extent that 51 all or part of such adjustment, in the 52 discretion of the commissioner, is likely 53 to have a material impact on the overall 54 medicaid program, particular categories of 55 service or particular geographic regions 56 of the state. S. 7239 8 1 (a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid 2 savings allocation adjustment on the 3 department of health's website and shall 4 provide written copies of such adjustment 5 to the chairs of the senate finance and 6 the assembly ways and means committees at 7 least 30 days before the date on which 8 implementation is expected to begin. 9 (b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid 10 savings allocation adjustment subsequent 11 to the provisions of notice and prior to 12 implementation but needs to provide a new 13 notice pursuant to subparagraph (i) of 14 this paragraph only if the commissioner 15 determines, in his or her discretion, that 16 such revisions materially alter the 17 adjustment. 18 Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs 19 (a) and (b) of this subdivision, the 20 commissioner need not seek the input 21 described in paragraph (a) of this subdi- 22 vision or provide notice pursuant to para- 23 graph (b) of this subdivision if, in the 24 discretion of the commissioner, expedited 25 development and implementation of a medi- 26 caid savings allocation adjustment is 27 necessary due to a public health emergen- 28 cy. 29 For purposes of this section, a public 30 health emergency is defined as: (i) a 31 disaster, natural or otherwise, that 32 significantly increases the immediate need 33 for health care personnel in an area of 34 the state; (ii) an event or condition that 35 creates a widespread risk of exposure to a 36 serious communicable disease, or the 37 potential for such widespread risk of 38 exposure; or (iii) any other event or 39 condition determined by the commissioner 40 to constitute an imminent threat to public 41 health. 42 Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to 43 prevent all or part of such medicaid 44 savings allocation adjustment from taking 45 effect retroactively to the extent permit- 46 ted by the federal centers for medicare 47 and medicaid services. 48 In accordance with the medicaid savings 49 allocation adjustment, the commissioner of 50 the department of health shall reduce 51 department of health state funds medicaid 52 spending by the amount of the projected 53 overspending through, actions including, 54 but not limited to modifying or suspending 55 reimbursement methods, including but not 56 limited to all fees, premium levels and S. 7239 9 1 rates of payment, notwithstanding any 2 provision of law that sets a specific 3 amount or methodology for any such 4 payments or rates of payment; modifying or 5 discontinuing medicaid program benefits; 6 seeking all necessary federal approvals, 7 including, but not limited to waivers, 8 waiver amendments; and suspending time 9 frames for notice, approval or certif- 10 ication of rate requirements, notwith- 11 standing any provision of law, rule or 12 regulation to the contrary, including but 13 not limited to sections 2807 and 3614 of 14 the public health law, section 18 of chap- 15 ter 2 of the laws of 1988, and 18 NYCRR 16 505.14(h). 17 The department of health shall prepare a 18 quarterly report that sets forth: (a) 19 known and projected department of health 20 medicaid expenditures as described in 21 subdivision (1) of this section, and 22 factors that could result in medicaid 23 disbursements for the relevant state 24 fiscal year to exceed the projected 25 department of health state funds disburse- 26 ments in the enacted budget financial plan 27 pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 23 of 28 the state finance law, including spending 29 increases or decreases due to: enrollment 30 fluctuations, rate changes, utilization 31 changes, MRT investments, and shift of 32 beneficiaries to managed care; and vari- 33 ations in offline medicaid payments; and 34 (b) the actions taken to implement any 35 medicaid savings allocation adjustment 36 implemented pursuant to subdivision (4) of 37 this section, including information 38 concerning the impact of such actions on 39 each category of service and each 40 geographic region of the state. Each such 41 quarterly report shall be provided to the 42 chairs of the senate finance and the 43 assembly ways and means committees and 44 shall be posted on the department of 45 health's website in a timely manner. 46 The money hereby appropriated is to be 47 available for payment of aid heretofore 48 accrued or hereafter accrued to munici- 49 palities, and to providers of medical 50 services pursuant to section 367-b of the 51 social services law, and for payment of 52 state aid to municipalities and to provid- 53 ers of family care where payment systems 54 through the fiscal intermediaries are not 55 operational. S. 7239 10 1 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 2 of law to the contrary, funds may be used 3 by the department for outside legal 4 assistance on issues involving the federal 5 government, the conduct of preadmission 6 screening and annual resident reviews 7 required by the state's medicaid program, 8 computer matching with insurance carriers 9 to insure that medicaid is the payer of 10 last resort and activities related to the 11 management of the pharmacy benefit avail- 12 able under the medicaid program. 13 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 14 of law, in lieu of payments authorized by 15 the social services law, or payments of 16 federal funds otherwise due to the local 17 social services districts for programs 18 provided under the federal social security 19 act or the federal food stamp act, funds 20 herein appropriated, in amounts certified 21 by the state commissioner of temporary and 22 disability assistance or the state commis- 23 sioner of health as due from local social 24 services districts each month as their 25 share of payments made pursuant to section 26 367-b of the social services law may be 27 set aside by the state comptroller in an 28 interest-bearing account in order to 29 ensure the orderly and prompt payment of 30 providers under section 367-b of the 31 social services law pursuant to an esti- 32 mate provided by the commissioner of 33 health of each local social services 34 district's share of payments made pursuant 35 to section 367-b of the social services 36 law. 37 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 38 of law, funding made available by these 39 appropriations shall support direct salary 40 costs and related fringe benefits within 41 the medical assistance program associated 42 with any minimum wage increase that takes 43 effect during the timeframe of these 44 appropriations, pursuant to section 652 of 45 the labor law. Each eligible organization 46 in receipt of funding made available by 47 these appropriations may be required to 48 submit written certification, in such form 49 and at such time the commissioner may 50 prescribe, attesting to the total amount 51 of funds used by the eligible organiza- 52 tion, how such funding will be or was used 53 for purposes eligible under these appro- 54 priations and any other reporting deemed 55 necessary by the commissioner. The amounts 56 appropriated herein may include advances S. 7239 11 1 to organizations authorized to receive 2 such funds to accomplish this purpose. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 4 the money hereby appropriated may be 5 increased or decreased by interchange or 6 transfer, with any appropriation of the 7 department of health and the office of 8 medicaid inspector general and may be 9 increased or decreased by transfer or 10 suballocation between these appropriated 11 amounts and appropriations of the depart- 12 ment of health state purpose account, the 13 office of mental health, office for people 14 with developmental disabilities, the 15 office of addiction services and supports, 16 the department of family assistance office 17 of temporary and disability assistance, 18 the department of corrections and communi- 19 ty supervision, the office of information 20 technology services, the state university 21 of New York, and office of children and 22 family services, the office of medicaid 23 inspector general, the state education 24 department, and the state office for the 25 aging with the approval of the director of 26 the budget, who shall file such approval 27 with the department of audit and control 28 and copies thereof with the chairman of 29 the senate finance committee and the 30 chairman of the assembly ways and means 31 committee. 32 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 33 of law to the contrary, the moneys hereby 34 appropriated may be used for payments to 35 the centers for medicaid and medicare 36 services for obligations incurred related 37 to the pharmaceutical costs of dually 38 eligible medicare/medicaid beneficiaries 39 participating in the medicare drug benefit 40 authorized by P.L. 108-173. 41 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 42 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated 43 shall not be used for any existing rates, 44 fees, fee schedule, or procedures which 45 may affect the cost of care and services 46 provided by personal care providers, case 47 managers, health maintenance organiza- 48 tions, out of state medical facilities 49 which provide care and services to resi- 50 dents of the state, providers of transpor- 51 tation services, that are altered, 52 amended, adjusted or otherwise changed by 53 a local social services district unless 54 previously approved by the department of 55 health and the director of the budget. S. 7239 12 1 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 2 of law to the contrary, funds shall be 3 made available to the commissioner of the 4 office of mental health or the commission- 5 er of the office of addiction services and 6 supports, in consultation with the commis- 7 sioner of health and approved by the 8 director of the budget, and consistent 9 with appropriations made therefor, to 10 implement allocation adjustment developed 11 by each such commissioner which shall 12 describe mental health or substance use 13 disorder services that should be developed 14 to meet service needs resulting from the 15 reduction of inpatient behavioral health 16 services provided under the medicaid 17 program, by programs licensed pursuant to 18 article 31 or 32 of the mental hygiene 19 law. Such programs may include programs 20 that are licensed pursuant to both article 21 31 of the mental hygiene law and article 22 28 of the public health law, or certified 23 under both article 32 of the mental 24 hygiene law and article 28 of the public 25 health law. 26 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 27 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may 28 be available for payments associated with 29 the resolution by settlement agreement or 30 judgment of rate appeals and/or litigation 31 where the department of health is a party. 32 For services and expenses of the medical 33 assistance program including hospital 34 inpatient services and general hospitals 35 that are safety-net providers that evince 36 severe financial distress, pursuant to 37 criteria determined by the commissioner, 38 shall be eligible for awards for amounts 39 appropriated herein, to enable such 40 providers to maintain operations and vital 41 services while establishing long term 42 solutions to achieve sustainable health 43 services. 44 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions 45 of law, no expenditures shall be used for 46 the medical assistance program for any 47 expenses not explicitly authorized in law 48 without the approval of the director of 49 the budget. 50 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 51 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 52 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 53 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 54 reappropriation for this item covering 55 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 56 ation for this item covering fiscal year S. 7239 13 1 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 2 laws of 2024 (26947) ........................ 40,400,000 3 For services and expenses of the medical 4 assistance program including hospital 5 outpatient and emergency room services. 6 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 7 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 8 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 9 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 10 reappropriation for this item covering 11 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 12 ation for this item covering fiscal year 13 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 14 laws of 2024 (26948) ........................ 10,432,000 15 For services and expenses of the medical 16 assistance program including clinic 17 services. 18 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 19 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 20 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 21 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 22 reappropriation for this item covering 23 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 24 ation for this item covering fiscal year 25 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 26 laws of 2024 (26949) ........................ 19,026,000 27 For services and expenses of the medical 28 assistance program including nursing home 29 services. 30 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 31 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 32 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 33 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 34 reappropriation for this item covering 35 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 36 ation for this item covering fiscal year 37 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 38 laws of 2024 (26950) ........................ 50,936,000 39 For services and expenses of the medical 40 assistance program including other long 41 term care services. 42 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 43 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 44 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 45 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 46 reappropriation for this item covering 47 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 48 ation for this item covering fiscal year 49 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 50 laws of 2024 (26951) ....................... 140,778,000 51 For services and expenses of the medical 52 assistance program including managed care 53 services including regional planning 54 activities of the finger lakes health 55 systems agency, including statewide coor- 56 dination and demonstration of best prac- S. 7239 14 1 tices. The department shall make grants 2 within amounts appropriated therefor, to 3 assure high-quality and accessible primary 4 care, to provide technical assistance to 5 support financial and business planning 6 for integrated systems of care, and to 7 assist primary care providers in the 8 adoption, implementation, and meaningful 9 use of electronic health record technolo- 10 gy. 11 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 12 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 13 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 14 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 15 reappropriation for this item covering 16 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 17 ation for this item covering fiscal year 18 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 19 laws of 2024 (26952) ........................ 86,862,000 20 For services and expenses for health homes 21 including grants to health homes. 22 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 23 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 24 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 25 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 26 reappropriation for this item covering 27 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 28 ation for this item covering fiscal year 29 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 30 laws of 2024 (29548) ......................... 6,032,000 31 For services and expenses of the medical 32 assistance program including pharmacy 33 services provided, however, that no funds 34 shall be made available pursuant to this 35 appropriation for any drug not explicitly 36 authorized in any enacted law, rule, or 37 regulation without approval from the 38 director of the budget. 39 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 40 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 41 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 42 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 43 reappropriation for this item covering 44 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 45 ation for this item covering fiscal year 46 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 47 laws of 2024 (26953) ........................ 96,952,000 48 For services and expenses of the medical 49 assistance program including transporta- 50 tion services. 51 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 52 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 53 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 54 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 55 reappropriation for this item covering S. 7239 15 1 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 2 ation for this item covering fiscal year 3 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 4 laws of 2024 (26954) ........................ 14,344,000 5 For services and expenses of the medical 6 assistance program including dental 7 services. 8 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 9 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 10 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 11 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 12 reappropriation for this item covering 13 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 14 ation for this item covering fiscal year 15 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 16 laws of 2024 (26955) ........................... 164,000 17 For services and expenses of the medical 18 assistance program including non-institu- 19 tional and other spending. 20 The money hereby appropriated is available 21 for payment of liabilities heretofore 22 accrued or hereafter accrued. 23 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 24 of law, the money hereby appropriated may 25 be available for payments to any county or 26 public school districts associated with 27 additional claims for school supportive 28 health services. 29 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 30 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 31 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 32 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 33 reappropriation for this item covering 34 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 35 ation for this item covering fiscal year 36 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 37 laws of 2024 (26956) ........................ 39,604,000 38 For services and expenses of the medical 39 assistance program including medical 40 services provided at state facilities 41 operated by the office of mental health, 42 the office for people with developmental 43 disabilities and the office of addiction 44 services and supports. 45 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 46 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 47 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 48 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 49 reappropriation for this item covering 50 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 51 ation for this item covering fiscal year 52 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 53 laws of 2024 (26961) ......... [83,400,000] 166,800,000 54 -------------- 55 Special Revenue Funds - Federal S. 7239 16 1 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 2 Medicaid Direct Account - 25106 3 For services and expenses for the medical 4 assistance program, including administra- 5 tive expenses for local social services 6 districts, pursuant to title XIX of the 7 federal social security act or its succes- 8 sor program. 9 The moneys hereby appropriated are to be 10 available for payment of aid heretofore 11 accrued or hereafter accrued to munici- 12 palities, and to providers of medical 13 services pursuant to section 367-b of the 14 social services law, and for payment of 15 state aid to municipalities and to provid- 16 ers of family care where payment systems 17 through the fiscal intermediaries are not 18 operational. 19 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 20 of law, funding made available by these 21 appropriations shall support direct salary 22 costs and related fringe benefits within 23 the medical assistance program associated 24 with any minimum wage increase that takes 25 effect during the timeframe of these 26 appropriations, pursuant to section 652 of 27 the labor law. Each eligible organization 28 in receipt of funding made available by 29 these appropriations may be required to 30 submit written certification, in such form 31 and at such time the commissioner may 32 prescribe, attesting to the total amount 33 of funds used by the eligible organiza- 34 tion, how such funding will be or was used 35 for purposes eligible under these appro- 36 priations and any other reporting deemed 37 necessary by the commissioner. The amounts 38 appropriated herein may include advances 39 to organizations authorized to receive 40 such funds to accomplish this purpose. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 42 the money hereby appropriated may be 43 increased or decreased by interchange or 44 transfer, with any appropriation of the 45 department of health and the office of 46 medicaid inspector general and may be 47 increased or decreased by transfer or 48 suballocation between these appropriated 49 amounts and appropriations of the office 50 of mental health, office for people with 51 developmental disabilities, the office of 52 addiction services and supports, the 53 department of family assistance office of 54 temporary and disability assistance, 55 office of children and family services, S. 7239 17 1 the department of financial services, 2 department of corrections and community 3 supervision, the office of information 4 technology services, the state university 5 of New York, the state education depart- 6 ment, and the state office for the aging 7 with the approval of the director of the 8 budget, who shall file such approval with 9 the department of audit and control and 10 copies thereof with the chairman of the 11 senate finance committee and the chairman 12 of the assembly ways and means committee. 13 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 14 of law, in lieu of payments authorized by 15 the social services law, or payments of 16 federal funds otherwise due to the local 17 social services districts for programs 18 provided under the federal social security 19 act or the federal food stamp act, funds 20 herein appropriated, in amounts certified 21 by the state commissioner of temporary and 22 disability assistance or the state commis- 23 sioner of health as due from local social 24 services districts each month as their 25 share of payments made pursuant to section 26 367-b of the social services law may be 27 set aside by the state comptroller in an 28 interest-bearing account in order to 29 ensure the orderly and prompt payment of 30 providers under section 367-b of the 31 social services law pursuant to an esti- 32 mate provided by the commissioner of 33 health of each local social services 34 district's share of payments made pursuant 35 to section 367-b of the social services 36 law. 37 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 38 of law to the contrary, funds shall be 39 made available to the commissioner of the 40 office of mental health or the commission- 41 er of the office of addiction services and 42 supports, in consultation with the commis- 43 sioner of health and approved by the 44 director of the budget, and consistent 45 with appropriations made therefor, to 46 implement allocation adjustment developed 47 by each such commissioner which shall 48 describe mental health or substance use 49 disorder services that should be developed 50 to meet service needs resulting from the 51 reduction of inpatient behavioral health 52 services provided under the medicaid 53 program, by programs licensed pursuant to 54 article 31 or 32 of the mental hygiene 55 law. Such programs may include programs 56 that are licensed pursuant to both article S. 7239 18 1 31 of the mental hygiene law and article 2 28 of the public health law, or certified 3 under both article 32 of the mental 4 hygiene law and article 28 of the public 5 health law. 6 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 7 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may 8 be available for payments associated with 9 the resolution by settlement agreement or 10 judgment of rate appeals and/or litigation 11 where the department of health is a party. 12 Notwithstanding any inconsistent 13 provisions of law, no expenditures shall 14 be used for the medical assistance program 15 for any expenses not explicitly authorized 16 in law without the approval of the direc- 17 tor of the budget. 18 For services and expenses of the medical 19 assistance program including hospital 20 inpatient services. 21 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 22 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 23 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 24 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 25 reappropriation for this item covering 26 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 27 ation for this item covering fiscal year 28 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 29 laws of 2024 (26947) ......... [57,814,000] 115,628,000 30 For services and expenses of the medical 31 assistance program including hospital 32 outpatient and emergency room services. 33 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 34 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 35 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 36 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 37 reappropriation for this item covering 38 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 39 ation for this item covering fiscal year 40 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 41 laws of 2024 (26948) ......... [10,372,000] 20,744,000 42 For services and expenses of the medical 43 assistance program including clinic 44 services. 45 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 46 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 47 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 48 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 49 reappropriation for this item covering 50 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 51 ation for this item covering fiscal year 52 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 53 laws of 2024 (26949) ......... [16,967,000] 33,934,000 54 For services and expenses of the medical 55 assistance program including nursing home 56 services. S. 7239 19 1 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 2 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 3 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 4 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 5 reappropriation for this item covering 6 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 7 ation for this item covering fiscal year 8 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 9 laws of 2024(26950) .......... [79,359,000] 158,718,000 10 For services and expenses of the medical 11 assistance program including other long 12 term care services. 13 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 14 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 15 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 16 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 17 reappropriation for this item covering 18 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 19 ation for this item covering fiscal year 20 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 21 laws of 2024 (26951) ........ [132,394,000] 264,788,000 22 For services and expenses of the medical 23 assistance program including managed care 24 services including regional planning 25 activities of the finger lakes health 26 systems agency, including statewide coor- 27 dination and demonstration of best prac- 28 tices. The department shall make grants 29 within amounts appropriated therefor, to 30 assure high-quality and accessible primary 31 care, to provide technical assistance to 32 support financial and business planning 33 for integrated systems of care, and to 34 assist primary care providers in the 35 adoption, implementation, and meaningful 36 use of electronic health record technolo- 37 gy. 38 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 39 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 40 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 41 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 42 reappropriation for this item covering 43 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 44 ation for this item covering fiscal year 45 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 46 laws of 2024 (26952) ........ [150,829,000] 301,658,000 47 For services and expenses of the medical 48 assistance program including pharmacy 49 services, provided, however, that no funds 50 shall be made available pursuant to this 51 appropriation for any drug not explicitly 52 authorized in any heretofore enacted law, 53 rule, or regulation without approval from 54 the director of the budget. 55 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 56 contrary, the portion of this appropri- S. 7239 20 1 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 2 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 3 reappropriation for this item covering 4 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 5 ation for this item covering fiscal year 6 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 7 laws of 2024 (26953) ......... [92,616,000] 185,232,000 8 For services and expenses of the medical 9 assistance program including transporta- 10 tion services. 11 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 12 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 13 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 14 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 15 reappropriation for this item covering 16 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 17 ation for this item covering fiscal year 18 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 19 laws of 2024 (26954) ......... [12,235,000] 24,470,000 20 For services and expenses of the medical 21 assistance program including dental 22 services. 23 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 24 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 25 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 26 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 27 reappropriation for this item covering 28 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 29 ation for this item covering fiscal year 30 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 31 laws of 2024 (26955) ........... [1,422,000] 2,844,000 32 For services and expenses of the medical 33 assistance program including noninstitu- 34 tional and other spending. 35 The money hereby appropriated is available 36 for payment of liabilities heretofore 37 accrued or hereafter accrued. 38 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 39 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 40 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 41 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 42 reappropriation for this item covering 43 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 44 ation for this item covering fiscal year 45 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 46 laws of 2024 (26956) ....... [137,631,000] 275,262,000 47 For services and expenses of the medical 48 assistance program including medical 49 services provided at state facilities 50 operated by the office of mental health, 51 the office for people with developmental 52 disabilities and the office of addiction 53 services and supports. 54 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 55 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 56 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall S. 7239 21 1 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 2 reappropriation for this item covering 3 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 4 ation for this item covering fiscal year 5 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the 6 laws of 2024 (26961) ........ [83,400,000] 166,800,000 7 -------------- 8 § 7. Section 6 of chapter 113 of the laws of 2025, relating to making 9 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 117 10 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 11 § 6. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 12 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 13 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 14 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 15 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2025. 16 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR 17 AID TO LOCALITIES 18 UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE BENEFIT PROGRAM ...... [195,000,000] 345,000,000 19 -------------- 20 Enterprise Funds 21 Unemployment Insurance Benefit Fund 22 Unemployment Insurance Benefit Account - 50650 23 For payment of unemployment insurance bene- 24 fits pursuant to article 18 of the labor 25 law or as authorized by the federal 26 government through the disaster unemploy- 27 ment assistance program, the emergency 28 unemployment compensation program, the 29 extended benefit program, the federal 30 additional compensation program or any 31 other federally funded unemployment bene- 32 fit program (34787) ......... [195,000,000] 345,000,000 33 § 8. Section 8 of chapter 113 of the laws of 2025, relating to making 34 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 117 35 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 36 § 8. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 37 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 38 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 39 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 40 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2025. 41 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES 42 AID TO LOCALITIES 43 VETERANS' BENEFITS ADVISING PROGRAM .............. [98,000] 126,000 44 -------------- 45 Special Revenue Funds - Other S. 7239 22 1 Homeless Veterans Assistance Fund 2 Homeless Veterans Assistance Account - 20204 3 For services and expenses related to home- 4 less veterans' housing (54815) ... [98,000] 126,000 5 § 9. No expenditure may be made from any appropriation in this act, 6 until a certificate of approval has been issued by the director of the 7 budget and a copy of such certificate shall have been filed with the 8 state comptroller, the chairman of the senate finance committee and the 9 chairman of the assembly ways and means committee provided, however, 10 that any expenditures from any appropriation in this act made by the 11 legislature or judiciary shall not require such certificate. 12 § 10. All expenditures and disbursements made against the appropri- 13 ations in this act shall, upon final action by the legislature on appro- 14 priation bills submitted by the governor pursuant to article VII of the 15 state constitution for the support of government for the state fiscal 16 year beginning April 1, 2025, be transferred by the comptroller as 17 expenditures and disbursements to such appropriations for all state 18 departments and agencies, as applicable, in amounts equal to the amounts 19 charged against the appropriations in this act for each such department, 20 agency, and the legislature and the judiciary. 21 § 11. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdi- 22 vision, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of 23 competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, 24 impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in 25 its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section 26 or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judg- 27 ment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of 28 the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such 29 invalid provisions had not been included herein. 30 § 12. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 31 have been in full force and effect on and after April 1, 2025; provided, 32 however, that upon the transfer of expenditures and disbursements by the 33 comptroller as provided in section ten of this act, the appropriations 34 made by this act and subject to such section shall be deemed repealed.